Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.005

Declaration, intent, construction.

The legislature declares that the licensing of bail bond agents should be uniform throughout the state. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to preempt any local regulation of bail bond agents, including licensing fees, but not including local business license fees. Nothing in this chapter limits the discretion of the courts of this state to accept or reject a particular surety or recognizance bond in a particular case.

[ 1993 c 260 s 1.]